Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB648.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2506(a) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2506. Drug delivery resulting in death.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits a felony of the first degree if the person intentionally manufactures, administers, dispenses, delivers, gives, prescribes, sells or distributes any controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance in violation of section 13(a)(14) or (30) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, and another person dies as a result of using the substance.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 (g) Defense.--It is not a defense to a violation under this section that the person died:(1) after voluntarily using a controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance; or( 2) as a result of using the controlled substance or counterfeit controlled substance in combination with alcohol, another controlled substance or with any other drug, compound, mixture, diluent or substance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0648PN0657 - 2 - 123456789